Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.86.020

Intimate images—Forfeiture by minors.

A minor who possesses any image of any other minor which constitutes an intimate image as defined in RCW 9A.86.010 or a fabricated intimate image as defined in RCW 9A.86.030 forfeits any right to continued possession of the image and any court exercising jurisdiction over such image shall order forfeiture of the image.

[ 2024 c 88 s 9; 2019 c 128 s 10.]

NOTES:

Short title—2019 c 128: See note following RCW 13.40.660.